North Dakota, session 69, SB2252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 16.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
District endorsing caucus or convention - Notice to secretary of state - When held -
How selected.
1. Between July first and December first of each odd - numbered year, the distric t
committee of a district party in each legislative district shall vote to decide whether to
hold an endorsing caucus or convention as described under this section or participate
in a primary election under chapter 16.1 - 11 to nominate legislative candidates. If a
majority of the district committee chooses to participate in a primary election, a primary
election must be held under chapter 16.1 - 11. If the district committee chooses to hold
an endorsing caucus or convention, the district party of the legislative district shall hold
a caucus election or convention by May first of each - even numbered year to endorse
legislative candidates to appear as the party's nominees at the general election. Within
ten days of deciding whether to hold an endorsing caucus or convention or participate
in the primary election, the district committee shall notify the secretary of state of the
decision made under this subsection. The decision made under this subsection is final
and may not be changed at a later date. If the district committee fails to decide or
Page No. 1 25.0769.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
timely notify the secretary of the state as required under this subsection, a primary
election must be held under chapter 16.1 - 11 .
2. If an endorsing caucus or convention is held, a qualified elector under section
16.1 - 01 - 04 may vote or be nominated as a legislative candidate at the caucus or
convention. If the right of an individual to participate at the caucus or convention is
challenged, the question of the individual's right to participate must be decided by a
vote of the whole caucus or convention. An individual subject to the challenge may not
vote on the question of the individual's right to participate in the caucus or convention,
and a two - thirds vote of the whole caucus or individuals participating in the convention
is required to exclude an individual from participation.
3. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes at the endorsing caucus or
convention is the endorsed nominee for the office sought by that candidate. Upon
nomination, the chairman shall issue a certificate of endorsement to each nominee as
provided under section 16.1 - 11 - 06. Upon receiving the certificate of endorsement, an
affidavit of candidacy described in section 16.1 - 11 - 10, and a statement of interes t
described in section 16.1 - 09 - 03 by four p.m. on the fortieth day before the genera l
election, the secretary of state shall place the nominees on the general election ballot.
This section does not preclude a candidate who failed to receive the caucus or
convention endorsement under this section from appearing on the general election
ballot as an independent candidate as provided under section 16.1 - 12 - 02 .
4. If an endorsing caucus or convention is scheduled to occur within the same year as
the redistricting of the legislative assembly, the secretary of state shall determine the
date of the endorsing caucus or convention during that calendar year.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-03-11. State committee - Meetings - Organization - Decision to hold endorsing
caucus or convention or participate in primary election - Notice to secretary of state .
1. The state committee shall meet on or before July first of each odd-numbered year. The
committee shall organize by selecting officers as provided for by the state committee
bylaws and by adopting rules and modes of procedure, including rules and procedures
regarding the selection of state convention delegates. Within thirty days following the
Page No. 2 25.0769.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
state committee's organization, the newly elected chairman shall notify the secretary
of state of the names of the party officers selected.
2. Between July first and December first of each odd - numbered year, the state
committee of a state party shall vote to decide whether to hold an endorsing caucus or
convention as described under section 16.1 - 03 - 14 or participate in the primary election
under chapter 16.1 - 11 to nominate partisan statewide candidates. If a majority of the
state committee chooses to participate in a primary election, a primary election must
be held under chapter 16.1 - 11. If the state committee chooses to hold an endorsing
caucus or convention, the state party shall hold a caucus election or convention by
May first of each - even numbered year to endorse partisan statewide candidates to
appear as the party's nominees at the general election as provided under section
16.1 - 03 - 14. Within ten days of deciding whether to hold an endorsing caucus or
convention or participate in the primary, the state committee shall notify the secretary
of state of the decision made under this subsection. The decision made under this
subsection is final and may not be changed at a later date. If the state committee fails
to decide or timely notify the secretary of the state as required under this subsection, a
primary election must be held under chapter 16.1 - 11 .
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-03-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-03-14. State party convention - Endorsing caucus or convention .
1. The party state committee shall set the place and time ofhold the state party
convention to be held in each general election by May first of each even - numbered
year. Subject to party rules and bylaws, the state party convention mayshall:
a. Nominate the legal number of elector nominees and alternate elector nominees
for its party for the offices of presidential electors. The nominees must be
qualified electors of this state.;
b. Elect the required number of delegates and alternates to the national party
convention.; and
c. Endorse candidates to appear on the primary election ballot as provided under
section 16.1 - 03 - 11 or on the general election ballot as provided under
subsection 2.
Page No. 3 25.0769.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The candidate or candidates for endorsement or election must be declared endorsed
or elected under the rules of the party, and the chairman and secretary of the
convention If authorized under section 16.1 - 03 - 11, the state party shall hold an
endorsing caucus or convention to endorse all partisan statewide candidates to
appear as the party's nominees at the general election at the state party convention.
Only delegates selected under the state party rules and bylaws may vote to endorse a
partisan statewide candidate. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes for
each office is the endorsed nominee for that office.
3. Upon nomination under this section, the state party chairman and secretary of the
convention shall issue certificatesa certificate of endorsement as provided in section
16.1-11-06 or certificates of electionto each nominee. Upon receiving the certificate of
endorsement, an affidavit of candidacy described in section 16.1 - 11 - 10, and a
statement of interest described in section 16.1 - 09 - 03 by four p.m. on the fortieth day
before the election, the secretary of state shall place the nominees on the general
election ballot. This section does not preclude a candidate who failed to receive the
caucus or convention endorsement under this section from appearing on the general
election ballot as an independent candidate as provided under section 16.1 - 12 - 02 .
4. The names of the qualified electors nominated for presidential electors the party
wishes to place on the general election ballot must be certified by the chairman and
secretary of the convention to the secretary of state by four p.m. on the sixty-fourth
day before the general election to be placed upon the general election ballot as
provided in section 16.1-06-07.1.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-01. Primary election - When held - Nomination of candidates - Nomination for
special elections.
1. On the second Tuesday in June of every general election year, a primary election must
be held for the nomination of candidates for the following offices in the years of their
regular election: United States senators, member of the United States house of
representatives, members of the legislative assembly, elected statestatewide officials,
judges of the supreme court and district court, county officers, and county
Page No. 4 25.0769.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
commissioners. In special elections the nominations for the officers enumerated in this
section must be made as provided in this title.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a primary election only may be held for members of the
legislative assembly and partisan statewide officials if authorized under section 1 o f
this Act and section 16.1 - 03 - 11 .
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-12-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-12-10. Party committee to fill vacancy occurring after nomination for party office.
1. If a vacancy occurs in a slate of statewide candidates after the candidates have been
nominated at the primary election , under section 1 of this Act or section 16.1 - 03 - 11 ,
the state executive committee of the party that submitted the slate of statewide
candidates may fill the vacancy by filing a certificate of nomination with the secretary
of state. The chairman and secretary of the committee shall make and file with the
secretary of state a certificate setting forth the cause of the vacancy, the name of the
individual for whom the new nominee is to be substituted, the fact the committee was
authorized to fill vacancies, and any other information required to be provided in an
original certificate of nomination. When the certificate of nomination to fill a vacancy is
filed, the secretary of state shall certify the new nomination and the name of the
individual who has been nominated to fill the vacancy in place of the original nominee
to the various county auditors. If the secretary of state already has forwarded the
certificate, the secretary of state shall certify to the county auditors the name and
address of the new nominee, the office the new nominee is nominated for, the party or
political principle the new nominee represents, and the name of the individual for
whom the new nominee is substituting, as soon as possible. Failure to publish the
name of a new nominee does not invalidate the election.
2. If a vacancy occurs in a slate of legislative candidates after the candidates have been
nominated at the primary election , under section 1 of this Act or section 16.1 - 03 - 11 ,
the executive committee of the district in which the vacancy occurs and of the party
that submitted the slate of legislative candidates may fill the vacancy by filing a
certificate of nomination with the secretary of state. The chairman and secretary of the
committee shall make and file with the secretary of state a certificate setting forth the
Page No. 5 25.0769.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
cause of the vacancy, the name of the individual for whom the new nominee is to be
substituted, the fact the committee was authorized to fill vacancies, and any other
information required to be provided in an original certificate of nomination. When the
certificate of nomination to fill a vacancy is filed, the secretary of state shall certify the
new nomination to the various county auditors affected by the change by forwarding to
the auditors the name of the individual who has been nominated to fill the vacancy in
place of the original nominee, as soon as possible. The certification must include the
name and address of the new nominee, the office the new nominee is nominated for,
the party or political principle the new nominee represents, and the name of the
individual for whom the new nominee is substituting. Failure to publish the name of a
new nominee does not invalidate the election.
3. A vacancy in a nomination following a primary election, under section 1 of this Act or
section 16.1 - 03 - 11 , may not be filled according to subsection 1 or 2 unless the
nominated candidate:
a. Dies;
b. Would be unable to serve, if elected, as a result of a debilitating illness;
c. Ceases to be a resident of the state;
d. Is nominated to be a member of the legislative assembly and, at the time of the
election, will not be a resident of the legislative district to be represented; or
e. Ceases to be qualified to serve, if elected, as otherwise provided by law.
4. Vacancies to be filled according to this section may be filled not later than the
sixty-fourth day before the election.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-13-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-13-04. Candidates' names placed on official general election ballot.
The names of all candidates of each political party or principle or no-party designation, who
are shown to have been nominated for the several offices in accordance with section 1 of this
Act, section 16.1 - 03 - 11, and the certificates of nomination filed in the secretary of state's office,
must be placed by the secretary of state on the official ballot to be voted for at the next general
election.
Page No. 6 25.0769.04000